hu: Töltelék állaga: Babpaszta; Darabos gyümölcsös; Gyümölcskrém (Curd); Csurgatott bevonat; Zselé; Paszta; Por; Püré; Félig folyékony; Sima krém; Egyéb
vi: Độ đặc của nhân: Nhân đậu; Trái cây cắt khúc; Sữa đông; Lớp phủ nhỏ giọt; Gel; Hỗn hợp nhão; Dạng bột; Xay nhuyễn; Bán lỏng; Kem mịn; Khác
fi: Täytteen koostumus: Paputahna; Hedelmäpaloja sisältävä; Tahna (curd); Valumakuorrute; Geeli; Tahna; Jauhe; Sose; Puolinestemäinen; Sileä kreemi; Muu
ko: 필링 농도: 앙금; 과일 덩어리; 커드; 드립 코팅; 겔; 페이스트; 파우더; 퓌레; 반유동식; 부드러운 크림; 기타
nl: Vulling consistentie: Bonenpasta; Fruit met stukjes; Curd; Druppelcoating; Gel; Pasta; Poeder; Puree; Halvvloeibaar; Gladde crème; Overig
el: Συνοχή πλήρωσης: Πάστα φασολιών; Φρούτα σε κομμάτια; Κρέμα φρούτων (curd); Επικάλυψη τύπου drip; Τζελ; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Πουρές; Ημίρρευστο; Απαλή κρέμα; Άλλο
nb: Fyllkonsistens: Bønnepasta; Frukt med biter; Curd; Dryppbelegg; Gelé; Pasta; Pulver; Puré; Halvflytende; Glatt krem; Annet
zh-CN: 填充稠度: 豆沙; 大块果肉; 凝乳; 滴胶涂层; 凝胶; 糊状; 粉末; 果泥; 半流体; 丝滑奶油; 其他
pt-PT: consistência de enchimento: Pasta de feijão; Fruta em pedaços; Coalhada; Revestimento por gotejamento; Gel; Pasta; Pó; Puré; Semifluido; Creme suave; Outro
fr: Consistance de la garniture: Pâte de haricots; Fruits en morceaux; Caillé; Nappage; Gel; Pâte; Poudre; Purée; Semi-liquide; Crème lisse; Autre
de: Konsistenz der Füllung: Bohnenpaste; Fruchtstücke; Curd; Drip-Glasur; Gel; Paste; Pulver; Püree; Halbflüssig; Glatte Creme; Sonstige
cs: Konzistence náplně: Fazolová pasta; S kousky ovoce; Curd; Tekutá poleva; Gel; Pasta; Prášek; Pyré; Polotekuté; Hladký krém; Jiné
sk-SK: Konzistencia náplne: Fazuľová pasta; S kúskami ovocia; Krém; Poleva; Gél; Pasta; Prášok; Pyré; Polotekuté; Jemný krém; Iné
hr-HR: Konzistencija punjenja: Pasta od graha; Komadići voća; Skuta; Premaz u kapljicama; Gel; Pasta; Prah; Pire; Polutekuće; Glatka krema; Ostalo
zh-TW: 填充物質地: 豆沙; 水果塊; 凝乳; 滴淋塗層; 凝膠; 膏狀; 粉末; 果泥; 半流體; 柔滑奶油; 其他
pt-BR: Consistência de recheio: Pasta de feijão; Pedaços de fruta; Coalhada; Cobertura em gotas; Gel; Pasta; Pó; Purê; Semifluido; Creme liso; Outra
ru: Консистенция начинки: Бобовая паста; С кусочками фруктов; Курд; Жидкая глазурь; Гель; Паста; Порошок; Пюре; Полужидкая; Однородный крем; Другое
ro-RO: Consistența umplerii: Pastă de fasole; Fructe bucăți; Cremă de fructe (curd); Glazură cursă; Gel; Pastă; Pudră; Piure; Semifuid; Cremă fină; Altele
th: ความสม่ำเสมอของไส้ผลิตภัณฑ์: ถั่วกวน; ผลไม้แบบมีชิ้นเนื้อ; เคิร์ด; สารเคลือบแบบหยด; เจล; เนื้อเปสต์; ผง; พิวรี; กึ่งของเหลว; ครีมเนื้อเนียน; อื่นๆ
da: Fyldets konsistens: Bønnepasta; Frugtstykker; Curd; Drypovertræk; Gelé; Pasta; Pulver; Puré; Halvflydende; Glat creme; Andet
es: Consistencia de llenado: Pasta de frijoles; Fruta en trozos; Cuajada; Revestimiento de goteo; Gel; Pasta; Polvo; Puré; Semifluido; Crema suave; Otra
tr: Dolgu yoğunluğu: Fasulye ezmesi; Parçacıklı meyve; Lor; Akışkan kaplama; Jel; Ezme; Toz; Püre; Yarı akışkan; Pürüzsüz krema; Diğer
en: Filling consistency: Bean paste; Chunky fruit; Curd; Drip coating; Gel; Paste; Powder; Puree; Semi-fluid; Smooth cream; Other
pl: Konsystencja nadzienia: Pasta z fasoli; Z kawałkami owoców; Krem (curd); Płynna polewa (drip); Żel; Pasta; Proszek; Mus (puree); Półpłynna; Gładki krem; Inna
it: Consistenza del riempimento: Pasta di fagioli; Frutta a pezzettoni; Curd; Copertura a goccia; Gel; Pasta; Polvere; Purea; Semifluido; Crema liscia; Altro
lt-LT: Įdaro konsistencija: Pupelių pasta; Su vaisių gabaliukais; Kremas („curd“); Skystas glaistas; Gelis; Pasta; Milteliai; Tyrė; Pusiau skystas; Vientisas kremas; Kita
sv: Fyllningskonsistens: Bönpasta; Fruktbitar; Curd; Rinnande överdrag; Gelé; Pasta; Pulver; Puré; Halvflytande; Slät kräm; Övrigt
sl-SI: Konsistenca polnjenja: Fižolova pasta; Sadje s koščki; Krema; Tekoči obliv; Gel; Pasta; Prah; Pire; Poltekoče; Gladka krema; Drugo
bg-BG: Консистенция на пълнежа: Бобена паста; Плодове на парченца; Кърд; Течно покритие; Гел; Паста; Прах; Пюре; Полутечност; Гладък крем; Други
ja: フィリングの粘度: 豆ペースト; チャンキーフルーツ; カード; ドリップコーティング; ジェル; ペースト; パウダー; ピューレ; 半流動体; スムースクリーム; その他